Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.090

Conclusive presumption of validity.

A direct or collateral attack on a public improvement, public improvement ordinance, or increment area purported to be authorized or created in conformance with applicable legal requirements, including this chapter, may not be commenced more than thirty days after publication of notice as required by RCW 39.89.060.

[ 2001 c 212 s 9.]